Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 13
VESSELS

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1984 with an effective date of January 1, 1985. Prior to 1984, the substantive provisions of this article were contained in article 31 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

33-13-101. Legislative declaration.

It is the policy of this state to administer the registration and numbering of vessels in accordance with federal laws pertaining thereto and to promote the safety of persons and property in connection with the use, operation, and equipment of vessels.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 897, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-31-101 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-13-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 13, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Motorboat" means any vessel propelled by machinery, whether or not such machinery is the principal source of propulsion including "personal watercraft" as defined in subsection (3.3) of this section.

"Operate" means to navigate or otherwise use a vessel.

"Owner" means a person who claims lawful possession of a vessel by virtue of legal title or an equitable interest which entitles him to such possession.

(3.3) "Personal watercraft" means a motorboat that uses an inboard motor powering a water jet pump as its primary source of motive power and is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling on the vessel, rather than the conventional manner of sitting or standing inside the vessel. "Personal watercraft" includes a motorboat known as a "specialty prop-craft", which is similar in appearance to a personal watercraft but powered by an outboard or motor driven propeller.

(3.7) "Sailboard" means a sail propelled vessel with no freeboard and equipped with a swivel mounted mast, not secured to a hull by guys or stays.

"Sailboat" means any vessel propelled by the effect of wind on a sail, including sailboards. For the purposes of this article, any vessel propelled by both sail and machinery of any sort shall be deemed a motorboat, when being so propelled.

"Vessel" means every description of watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation of persons and property on the water, including all types of stand-up paddleboards.

"Vessel" does not include:

Any single-chambered, air-inflated devices that are not stand-up paddleboards; or

Seaplanes.

(5.5) "Vessel staging area" means any parking lot, boat ramp, or other location that any vessel is transported to or from by a motor vehicle and where such vessel is placed into operation on or in the water. "Vessel staging area" does not include any location to which a vessel is transported primarily for the purpose of service, maintenance, repair, or sale.

"Whitewater" means natural running water with intermittent rapids.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 897, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 88:

(4) amended, p. 1165, § 1, effective March 16.

L. 93:

(3.7) added, p. 1836, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended and (3.3) added, p. 1604, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2003:

(5.5) added, p. 1945, § 15, effective May 22.

L. 2020:

IP and (5) amended, (HB 20-1087), ch. 49, p. 171, § 9, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-31-102 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article 13, see § 33-10-102.

33-13-103. Numbering of vessels required - rules - repeal.

It is unlawful for any person to operate or use a vessel on the waters of this state or to possess a vessel at a vessel staging area unless the vessel has been numbered and the division has issued a certificate of the number, referred to in this article 13 as a "registration", to the vessel. The operator of the vessel shall produce the registration for inspection upon demand of any officer authorized to enforce articles 10 to 15 and 32 of this title 33. The following are exempt from the requirements of this subsection (1) and from the vessel registration fee as specified by the commission by rule:

Any vessel which is neither a motorboat nor a sailboat as defined in section 33-13-102; except that canoes, kayaks, and nonmotorized rafts exempted by this paragraph (a) shall be marked as required by subsection (5) of this section;

Vessels holding a valid marine document issued by the United States;

Vessels which are numbered in accordance with applicable federal law or in accordance with a federally approved numbering system of another state when the registration is valid and the identifying number set forth in the registration is displayed on each side of the bow of such vessel, which vessel is not used within this state during a period of not more than sixty consecutive days;

A vessel from a country other than the United States temporarily using the waters of this state;

A vessel belonging to a class of vessels which has been exempted after the division has found that the numbering of vessels of such class will not materially aid their identification, and, if an agency of the federal government has a numbering system applicable to the class of vessels to which the vessel in question belongs, after the division has further found that the vessel would also be exempt from numbering if it were subject to federal law;

Any vessel defined as a sailboard in section 33-13-102 (3.7) shall be marked as required by subsection (5) of this section.

Every registration issued pursuant to this article shall continue in full force and effect for a period ending December 31 of the year of issuance of the registration unless sooner terminated or discontinued in accordance with the provisions of this article. A registration may be renewed by the owner in the same manner as that provided for obtaining the initial registration. The same number shall be reissued if the application for renewal is received by the division within thirty days before the date of expiration.

The commission shall prescribe by rule a system of numbering that complies with the federal system for numbering vessels.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

It is unlawful for any person to operate or use a canoe, kayak, sailboard, or nonmotorized raft that is not required to be registered under subsection (1) of this section on the waters of this state unless it has been marked with the owner's name and current address in a legible, clearly visible, and durable fashion. Any person who violates this subsection (5) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of fifteen dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 897, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 88:

(1)(a) and (5) amended, p. 1165, §§ 2, 3, effective March 16.

L. 93:

(1)(f) added and (5) amended, p. 1836, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1.

L. 95:

IP(1) and (4) amended, p. 967, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended, p. 782, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (4) amended, p. 1945, § 16, effective May 22.

L. 2011:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 11-092), ch. 182, p. 694, § 4, effective May 19.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1225, § 56, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended, (HB 18-1139), ch. 71, p. 634, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3697, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4) and (5) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3263, § 567, effective March 1, 2022.

33-13-104. Application for vessel number - repeal.

The owner of each vessel requiring numbering by this state shall file an application for a number with the division or any representative approved by the division on forms approved and furnished by the division. The owner of the vessel must sign the application and pay an application fee as specified by the commission by rule; except that those vessels owned and operated by the state or any political subdivision of the state must be registered without payment of a registration fee. Upon receipt of the application in approved form, the division or its representative shall issue to the applicant a registration stating the number issued to the vessel. The number issued shall be painted on or attached to each side of the bow on the forward half of the vessel or, if there are no such sides, at a corresponding location on both sides of the foredeck of the vessel for which it is issued. The number issued must read from left to right in block characters of good proportion having a minimum of three inches in height, excluding border or trim, and of a color that contrasts with the color of the background, and must remain clearly visible and legible. Other numbers must not be carried on the bow of the vessel. Any person who fails to display a vessel number as required in this subsection (1) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of twenty-five dollars.

The registration shall be of pocket size and shall be on board and available at all times for inspection whenever the vessel for which it is issued is in operation in this state. Any person who violates this subsection (2) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars. If a registration is lost or destroyed, the owner shall, within fifteen days, notify the division. The notification shall be in writing, shall describe the circumstances of the loss or destruction, and shall be accompanied by a fee for a replacement registration as required under section 33-12-101.

When a numbered vessel is lost, destroyed, or abandoned, the registration issued for the vessel shall be surrendered to the division within fifteen days after any such event. When the owner of a numbered vessel changes his or her address from that shown on the registration, the owner shall notify the division within fifteen days of such change and, as a part of such notification, shall furnish the division with his or her new address. The commission may provide in its rules for the surrender of the registration bearing the former address and its replacement with a registration bearing the correct address or for the alteration of an outstanding registration to show the new address of the owner.

All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund and shall be used for the administration of this article.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 898, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 971, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 782, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1945, § 17, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1225, § 57, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1139), ch. 71, p. 634, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3264, § 568, effective March 1, 2022.

33-13-105. Seizure of vessels by officers - repeal.

Every parks and recreation officer and other peace officer of this state may seize and hold any vessel if such officer has probable cause to believe that the vessel is not in the lawful possession of the operator or person in charge thereof.

It is the duty of any officer seizing any vessel, on being informed of any such vessel, to immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agencies and the owner if known. Such notification shall contain a description of such vessel and any other helpful facts that may assist in locating or establishing the ownership thereof or in prosecuting any person for a violation of article 4 of title 18, C.R.S., or other state laws.

"Hull identification number" means any identifying number, serial number, engine number, or other distinguishing number or mark, including letters, if any, placed on a vessel or engine by its manufacturer or by authority of the division or in accordance with the laws of another state or country, excluding the vessel registration number.

Whenever a vessel is seized pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the law enforcement agency or a governmental entity may commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to determine whether said vessel shall be destroyed, sold, converted to the use of the seizing agency, or otherwise disposed of by an order of said court.

Any forfeiture proceeding initiated pursuant to this section shall be conducted in conformance with section 16-13-505, C.R.S.

For purposes of applying section 16-13-505, C.R.S., to a seizure hearing conducted pursuant to this section, "contraband" includes any vessel seized in accordance with this section.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the return of the seized vessel to the owner by the seizing agency following presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership and, if determined necessary, requiring the owner to obtain an assignment of a hull identification number for the vessel from the division.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 725, § 1, effective January 1, 1997.)

If the court having jurisdiction orders the vessel sold by the division, the proceeds of the sale shall be forwarded to the treasurer who shall credit such proceeds to the general fund.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 899, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 725, § 1, effective January 1, 1997.

Editor's note:

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2026, pursuant to § 33-13-116.

33-13-106. Equipment requirements.

No person shall operate a personal watercraft unless each person aboard is wearing a personal flotation device of a type approved by the United States Coast Guard that is in a good and serviceable condition.

A person operating a personal watercraft equipped by the original manufacturer with an engine cutoff switch lanyard shall attach such lanyard to his or her person, clothing, or personal flotation device, as appropriate for the specific vessel.

Every vessel, other than a personal watercraft, operated on the waters of this state shall at all times have aboard:

One personal flotation device of a type approved by the commandant of the United States Coast Guard in good and serviceable condition and in a readily accessible place of storage for each person on board; except that sailboard operators may wear a wet suit, as defined by the commission, in lieu of carrying a personal flotation device as required by this paragraph (a);

When in operation during hours of darkness, a light sufficient to make the vessel's presence and location known to any and all other vessels within a reasonable distance;

If not an entirely open vessel and if carrying or using any inflammable or toxic fluid in any enclosure for any purpose, an efficient natural or mechanical ventilation system which shall be capable of removing any resulting gases prior to and during the time such vessel is occupied by any person.

Every vessel operated on the waters of this state shall have such additional equipment that is designed to promote navigational safety and that the commission may find to be necessary or desirable for the safe operation of vessels upon the waters of this state.

(4.5) No person shall operate a vessel that has entered the water unless each child under the age of thirteen who is aboard such vessel is wearing a personal flotation device, unless such child is below deck or in an enclosed cabin. Such flotation device shall be of a type approved by the United States Coast Guard and shall be in good and serviceable condition.

Any person who violates this section commits a petty offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

The commission may exempt vessels from subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or (4.5) of this section under certain conditions or upon certain waters.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 901, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1837, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 972, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1604, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 2003:

(4.5) added and (5) and (6) amended, p. 1946, § 18, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(3)(a), (4), and (6) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1226, § 58, effective June 4.

L. 2019:

(5) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3697, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(5) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3264, § 569, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-31-105 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-13-107. Vessel liveries - repeal.

The owner or operator of a vessel livery shall keep a record of the name and address of each person who hires any vessel that is designed or permitted to be operated as a vessel, the hull identification number of the vessel, and the departure date and time and the expected date and time of return of the vessel. Such records shall be preserved for at least thirty days after the vessel is to be returned and shall be subject to inspection by the division. Any person who violates this subsection (1) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Neither the owner nor operator of a vessel livery nor such owner's or operator's agent or employee shall permit any vessel to depart from his or her premises unless such vessel is equipped and registered as required by this article 13 and rules promulgated pursuant to this article 13. Any person who violates this subsection (2) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 901, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 972, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1946, § 19, effective May 22.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (HB 16-1173), ch. 114, p. 323, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3264, § 570, effective March 1, 2022.

33-13-107.1. Minimum age of motorboat operators - youth education.

No person under sixteen years of age shall operate a motorboat in this state except as provided in this section.

A person fourteen years of age or older who has not reached his or her sixteenth birthday may operate a motorboat only if he or she:

Completes a boating safety course approved by the division of parks and wildlife; and

Has a boating safety certificate issued by the boating safety course provider in his or her possession.

No person shall permit or knowingly authorize a motorboat to be operated by a person under sixteen years of age; except that a person fourteen years of age or older who has not reached his or her sixteenth birthday may be permitted or authorized to operate a motorboat if he or she has met the boating safety and certificate requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

No owner or operator of a vessel livery or an agent or employee of such owner or operator shall lease, hire, or rent a motorboat to or for operation by any person under sixteen years of age; except that a person fourteen years of age or older who has not reached his or her sixteenth birthday may be permitted or authorized to operate a motorboat if he or she has met the boating safety and certificate requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

Any person who violates this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

It is the intent of the general assembly that no general fund dollars be appropriated for the purpose of implementing the requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1605, § 3, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2019:

(5) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3697, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(5) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3265, § 571, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-13-108. Prohibited vessel operations - rules.

No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of a vessel:

Which is not equipped as required by this article or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto;

Which emits noise in excess of the permissible level established in standards promulgated by the commission in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.;

Above a wakeless speed in areas zoned as wakeless, as defined by commission rule;

In a manner that violates any rule promulgated by the commission for safe use and operation of vessels.

No person shall operate a personal watercraft between one half hour after sunset and one half hour before sunrise.

Any person who violates subsection (1)(a) or (1)(a.5) of this section commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

It is unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in a careless or imprudent manner without due regard for zoning, traffic, and other attendant circumstances or as to endanger any person, property, or wildlife. For purposes of this paragraph (a), careless or imprudent vessel operation includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Becoming airborne or completely leaving the water while crossing the wake of another vessel at an unsafe distance from the vessel creating the wake or when visibility around such vessel is obstructed;

Unsafely weaving through vessel traffic;

Operating at such a speed and proximity to another vessel so as to require the operator of either vessel to abruptly swerve or to abruptly cut speed in order to avoid collision.

Any person who violates subsection (2)(a) of this section commits a petty offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars.

It is unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in a reckless manner. Any person who violates this subsection (3) commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article added, p. 902, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 89:

(4) amended, p. 1359, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 972, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(a)(IV) and (1)(a.5) added and (1)(b), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1606, §§ 4, 5, effective June 4.

L. 2003:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 1947, § 20, effective May 22.

L. 2008:

(4) repealed, p. 645, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(1)(a)(II), (1)(a)(III), and (1)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1226, § 59, effective June 4.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3697, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(b), (2)(b), and (3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3265, § 572, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-31-107 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.